Utah statutes.
62A-15-614.   Clinical director -- Appointment -- Conditions and procedure -- Duties.

(1)  Whenever the  superintendent is not qualified to be the clinical director of the state hospital under this section, he shall, with the approval of the director of the division, appoint a clinical director who is licensed to practice medicine and surgery in this state, and who has had at least three years' training in a psychiatric residency program approved by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc., and who is eligible for certification by that board.

(2)  The salary of the clinical director of the state hospital shall be fixed by the standards of the Division of Finance, to be paid in the same manner as the salaries of other employees.  The clinical director shall perform such duties as directed by the  superintendent and prescribed by the rules of the board, and shall prescribe and direct the treatment of patients and adopt sanitary measures for their welfare.

(3)  If the  superintendent is qualified to be the clinical director, he may assume the duties of the clinical director.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

